Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.260

Charter schools oversight account.

The charter schools oversight account is hereby created in the state treasury. All moneys received by the commission under RCW 28A.710.110 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of this chapter.

[ 2016 c 241 s 126. Prior: 2014 c 221 s 911.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2014 c 221: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 4, 2014]." [ 2014 c 221 s 927.]